Hawaii statutes.
§451J-1 Definitions. As used in
this chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

"Accredited educational institution"
means any educational institution which grants a master's or doctoral degree
and is accredited by a regional accrediting body or a post graduate training
institute accredited by the Commission on Accreditation for Marriage and Family
Education.

"Advertise" means the issuing of or
causing to be distributed any card, sign, or device to any person, or the
causing, permitting, or allowing of any sign or marking on or in any building,
on radio or television, or by advertising by any other means designed to secure
public attention.

"Association" means the American
Association for Marriage and Family Therapy.

"Clinical supervision" means the
supervision of no more than six persons at the same time who are acquiring and
completing clinical experience in accordance with section 451J-7(2) and (3), by
a licensed marriage and family therapist whose license has been in good standing
in any state for two years preceding commencement and during the term of
supervision, or any licensed mental health professional whose license has been
in good standing in any state and who has been a clinical member in good
standing of the association for the two years preceding commencement and during
the term of supervision. Clinical supervision includes but is not limited to
case consultation of the assessment and diagnosis of presenting problems,
development and implementation of treatment plans, and the evaluation of the
course of treatment. Clinical supervision may include direct observation by
the qualified supervisor of the provision of marriage and family therapy
services.

"Continuing education courses" means
courses approved by the American Association for Marriage and Family Therapy,
American Association for Marriage and Family Therapy: Hawaii Division,
American Psychological Association, Hawaii Psychological Association, National
Association of Social Workers, or National Board for Certified Counselors and
Affiliates, Inc.

"Credit hour" means, except as
otherwise provided, the value assigned to fifty minutes of instruction.

"Department" means the department of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Ethics courses" include ethics
theory, ethical reasoning, ethical principles, ethical dilemmas, and
professional ethics.

"Family systems theories" means a
body of research which focuses on understanding the family system and other social
systems of the individual as integral to evaluating the etiology and providing
treatment of mental and nervous disorders.

"Marriage and family therapist" or
"licensed marriage and family therapist" means a person who uses the
title of marriage and family therapist or licensed marriage and family
therapist, who has been issued a license under this chapter, and whose license
is in effect and not revoked or suspended at the time in question.

"Marriage and family therapy intern"
means a person who has completed all educational requirements stipulated in
section 451J-7(1)(A) and who is currently earning supervised clinical
experience in marriage and family therapy under clinical supervision.

"Marriage and family therapy
practice" means the application of psychotherapeutic and family systems
theories and techniques in the delivery of services to individuals, couples, or
families in order to diagnose and treat mental, emotional, and nervous
disorders, whether these are behavioral, cognitive, or affective, within the
context of the individual's relationships. Marriage and family therapy is
offered directly to the general public or through organizations, either public
or private, for a fee or through pro bono work. Marriage and family therapists
assist individuals, couples, and families to achieve more adequate, satisfying,
and productive social relationships, enable individuals to improve behavioral
or psychological functioning, and help individuals reduce distress or
disability. Marriage and family therapy includes but is not limited to:

(1) Assessment and diagnosis of presenting problems
through inquiry, observation, evaluation, integration of diagnostic information
from adjunctive resources, description, and interpretation of verbal and nonverbal
communication, thought processes, beliefs, affect, boundaries, roles, life
cycle stages, family interaction patterns, economic, social, emotional, and
mental functioning, in order to identify specific dysfunctions and to identify
the presence of disorders as identified in the Diagnostic and Statistical
Manual of Mental Disorders;

(2) Designing and developing treatment plans by
incorporating and integrating recognized family system theories, communication
principles, crisis counseling principles, cognitive and behavioral counseling
principles, or psychotherapeutic techniques in establishing short- and
long-term goals and interventions collaboratively with the client; and

(3) Implementing and evaluating the course of
treatment by incorporating family systems theories to assist individuals,
couples, and families to achieve more adequate, satisfying, and productive
social relationships, to enable individuals to improve behavioral or
psychological functioning, and to help individuals reduce distress or
disability by improving problem solving skills, decision-making skills,
communication and other relationship interaction patterns, identification of
strengths and weaknesses, understanding or resolution of interpersonal or
intrapersonal issues, recognition, development, and expression of appropriate
affect, and referral to adjunctive medical, psychological, psychiatric,
educational, legal, or social resources.

"Use of a title" means to hold
oneself out to the public as having a particular status by stating the status
on signs, mailboxes, address plates, stationery, announcements, telephone
directory advertising, business cards, or other instruments of professional
identification. [L 1998, c 159, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 28, §2; am L 2016, c 29,
§5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next